Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.688

[Art. 92] Failure to obey order or regulation.

Any person subject to this code who:

(1) Violates or fails to obey any lawful general order or regulation;

(2) Having knowledge of any other lawful order issued by a member of the organized militia which it is the person's duty to obey, fails to obey the order; or

(3) Is derelict in the performance of the person's duties;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

[ 1989 c 48 s 65; 1963 c 220 s 91.]